Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3149
Tax credit; partnership, limited liability company, or subchapter S corporation; amount.

(1) Any partnership, limited liability company, or corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is carrying on any trade or business for which deductions would be allowed under section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or is carrying on any rental activity, and that makes one or more cash contributions to one or more eligible charitable organizations during a tax year shall be eligible for a credit against the income tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the amount of the credit shall be equal to the lesser of (a) the total amount of such contributions made during the tax year or (b) fifty percent of the income tax liability of such taxpayer for the tax year. A taxpayer may only claim a credit pursuant to this section for the portion of the contribution that was not claimed as a charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The credit shall be attributed to each partner, member, or shareholder in the same proportion used to report the partnership's, limited liability company's, or subchapter S corporation's income or loss for income tax purposes.

(2) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the tax credit that is unused may be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.

(3) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section 77-3152.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 29.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.